Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 21. Department of Family Services

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, Ch. 209, § 2 states as follows: “There is authorized four (4) additional full-time positions to the department of family services.
For the purposes of this act there is appropriated from the general fund four hundred eighty thousand dollars ($480,000.00) to the department of family services for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008.”

§ 9-2-2101.
Department of family services; duties and responsibilities; state grants; authority to contract for shelters; definitions; youth programs.

The department of family services is created. The department of family services is the state youth services authority and the authority for public assistance and social services.

The department shall develop and administer a state program to provide shelter care for youth.

Subject to the availability of funds, the department shall administer a comprehensive state program for community services for youth which shall include the following:

A coordinated network of services by contracting for shelter services on a regional basis and for juvenile community alternatives on a county basis either through a contract with the county commissioners or through a contract with a single organization designated by the county commissioners. Contracting agencies may establish subcontracts in order to provide those services required by the department. All contracts purchasing services prepared by the department shall provide for periodic program and fiscal review of the operations and expenditure of state funds by the person or organization with whom the department has contracted. All contracts shall be terminated within sixty (60) days upon the occurrence of one (1) of the following unless the deficiency is corrected to the satisfaction of the department:

If the person or organization will not allow on site inspections and review of the programs purchased;

If misuse of state funds is found; or

If the program is not of an acceptable standard or quality.

Minimum standards and policies and procedures for the establishment and operation of the community services for youth;

Rules for the granting of contracts;

Monitoring regional shelter services facilities a minimum of once a year and state funded juvenile community services at least once every three (3) years.

In order to receive juvenile community alternative funds a county shall submit a plan to the department developed by representatives of public and private providers who provide services to troubled youth in the county. The plan shall be in accordance with rules and regulations established by the department. At a minimum the plan shall include:

Identification of gaps in services to troubled youth in the county and an explanation of the proposed projects;

Goals and objectives that will enable the department to monitor the activities that are funded, the number of children and families served and the outcomes achieved;

A demonstration of a commitment to keep youth in the home and community and to work with the family either with community alternative funds or through other funding;

Cooperative agreements among participating agencies which outline the activities to be undertaken by each agency to achieve the goals of the plan.

The purposes of the community services for youth program are to:

Work on the immediate problems of troubled youth in Wyoming communities;

Work with children and families to encourage the resolution of intrafamily problems through counseling and other services;

Work on reuniting youth with their families in cases where the child has been placed out of the home and where additional work needs to be done in order for the youth to be reintegrated into the family;

Strengthen family relationships and promote stable living conditions for troubled youth;

Help youth decide on a future course of action;

Provide appropriate alternatives to involvement in the correctional system.

Community services for youth may include treatment services either directly or through contracts with other agencies.

In order to qualify for funding under this section, a shelter services provider shall:

House no more than ten (10) children together within one (1) facility. This paragraph shall not:

Limit the number of children who may be served in a region; or

If requested by any local authority, prohibit a provider from providing temporary emergency shelter within one (1) facility to more than ten (10) children under the age of eighteen (18) years for not more than seventy-two (72) consecutive hours.

Develop individualized programming for children receiving shelter services for thirty (30) days or less which shall be distinct from individualized programming for children who are expected to receive shelter services for longer than thirty (30) days.

As used in this section:

“Community services for youth” means shelter services and juvenile community alternatives;

“Juvenile community alternatives” means projects which use existing services in a county to divert juveniles from approved correctional programs until no other solution can be determined suitable;

“Shelter services” means residential services for children through eighteen (18) years of age which shall include:

Temporary shelter;

Crisis counseling;

Family involvement;

Aftercare;

Individualized programming for each child.

If there is an existing shelter in a community that meets the criteria for placement of youth as specified in this section and is sufficient to meet the needs of the community, additional shelters shall not be acquired or constructed.

The department shall administer the low income home energy assistance program in accordance with W.S.

42-2-501

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 2; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2006, ch. 21, § 1; ch. 81, § 2; 2021 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (c)(i), in the first sentence, deleted “through a nonprofit board” following “regional basis” and deleted “nonprofit” following “single.”

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 81, § 2, added (k).

Laws 2006, ch. 81, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (c), added "Subject to the availability of funds" at the beginning, and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Plan for children and families. —

Laws 2004, ch. 44, § 1, provides:

“(a) The department of family services shall develop a comprehensive plan to improve the lives and futures of all children and families in Wyoming. In developing the plan, the department shall collaborate with the business councils of the Northern Arapaho tribe and Eastern Shoshone tribe, state and local agencies, including the department of health, the department of workforce services, the department of employment, the department of education, the department of corrections, the Wyoming business council, the University of Wyoming, Wyoming community colleges, the judiciary and private groups, service providers and businesses, including faith-based organizations and not-for-profit organizations, that express an interest in participating in the development of the plan. The plan shall:

“(i) Consider development of mechanisms to employ the use of public and private resources in an efficient manner to meet the needs of children and families;

“(ii) Include life span recommendations, including, in particular, prenatal and early childhood intervention and development practices that promote meaningful lifetime changes and minimize delays in life skills development;

“(iii) Review the current judicial system and make recommendations for reforms that may enable courts to better meet the needs of children and families;

“(iv) Examine how schools, community organizations, state agencies and the judicial system can work more closely together to enhance a sharing of resources and information to meet the needs of parents, preschool children and elementary and secondary school students;

“(v) Examine causes of the most serious problems facing children and families, including poverty, mental health needs, violence, the lack of adequate health care, the use of tobacco and illegal drugs and the abuse of alcohol;

“(vi) Examine issues of parent accountability;

“(vii) Encourage and support family stability;

“(viii) Not discriminate against private service providers in favor of governmental providers; and

“(ix) Review the state's existing efforts to determine where present funding and human resources could be employed in a more client-centered and efficient manner.

“(b) The department of family services shall submit a preliminary plan with recommendations for any initial legislation to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee no later than November 1, 2004. The final plan shall be submitted no later than October 1, 2005. Any recommendations contained in the plan shall be science-based or reflect practices that have a record of success. The plan shall specifically include recommendations:

“(i) For institutionalizing collaboration among state and local agencies and the private sector, including the business and faith community to provide seamless and integrated services in which funding is blended, when appropriate, to support client-centered plans that meet the needs of individual children and families;

“(ii) For addressing gaps or deficiencies in services;

“(iii) For early intervention and other services that seek to strengthen the bond between children and parents and place the primary responsibility for raising children on the family;

“(iv) For the consolidation of programs or funding sources where appropriate;

“(v) For the development of comprehensive, integrated state and community level approaches that will leave no child unsupported in critical aspects of life, particularly from birth through five (5) years of age;

“(vi) That will result in more integrated, efficient and effective programs and cost savings.

“(c) The department shall widely disseminate requests, including through electronic media, for the active participation of private groups and organizations in the development of the plans. Before submitting the preliminary and final plans to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, the department shall issue drafts of the plans for public review and hold at least one (1) public meeting in a central location in the state to receive public comments on each plan.

“(d) In addition to the appropriation contained in subsection (e) of this section, the department of family services, the department of health, the department of workforce services, the department of employment, the department of education, the department of corrections, the Wyoming business council, the University of Wyoming, Wyoming community colleges and the judiciary may utilize existing resources and apply for any federal or private grants that may be available to augment funding for the study and plan required under this act. The department may also contract with recognized experts and consultants to conduct the study and develop the plan and recommendations required by this act.

“(e) There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of family services two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) to implement the purposes of this act.”

Laws 2004, ch. 44, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Authority to petition for termination of parental rights. —

Department of Family Services (DFS), a public social service agency, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 9-2-2101(a), with authority to oversee the custody and care of children in cases of abuse and neglect under the Child Protection Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-401

through

14-3-441

, was an “authorized agency” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-2-308

and

14-2-310

with authority to file a petition to terminate a mother's parental rights, even though DFS did not have custody of the children. State v. DH (In the Interest of LB), 2014 WY 10, 316 P.3d 1184,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2014).

§ 9-2-2102.
Division administrators; appointment.

The director shall appoint a separate administrator for each of the divisions of the department of family services and he may discharge the administrators as provided in W.S. 9-2-1706(c)(ii).

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 2.

§ 9-2-2103.
Allocation, transfer and abolition of powers, duties and functions within department.

The governor may, after consultation with the director of the department and the departmental advisory council designate the department as the single state agency for the administration of state plans for public assistance and social assistance to administer upon such terms as the governor directs.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 2.

§ 9-2-2104.
Duties and powers of director of department.

The director shall:

Consult with the departmental advisory council and establish general policy to be followed in the department in administering programs;

Disburse and administer all federal funds or other monies allotted to the department;

Prescribe by rule, order or regulation the conditions under which these monies shall be disbursed and administered. Any audit performed shall comply with the requirements of W.S.

9-1-507

;

Enter into agreements, not inconsistent with the laws of this state, required as conditions precedent to receiving funds or other assistance. Funds appropriated by the legislature for operation of the department shall be used for the specified purposes only, and the director, in accepting funds from any other source, shall not consent to impairment of the department’s statutory responsibilities;

Hold hearings, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and take testimony as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act in all matters relating to the exercise and performance of the powers and duties vested in the department;

With the assistance of the attorney general bring actions in the courts of the state in the name of the department for the enforcement of public welfare laws;

Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, for the implementation of all state and federal welfare laws;

Appoint and prescribe the duties of the superintendent of the Wyoming boys’ school and the superintendent of the Wyoming girls’ school. Each superintendent shall be under the direct authority and control of the director and may be removed by the director at any time without cause;

Ensure all rules and other written statements of policy or interpretation formulated or adopted by the department use language which focuses on the importance of a person, rather than a person’s disability.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(iv) of this section, the director may use funds appropriated by the legislature for the operation of the department to pay health or medical insurance premiums for any resident of Wyoming upon a determination by the director or his designee that:

Due to an injury or illness, the person or his family is or may become unable to pay health or medical insurance premiums;

The person is or may become eligible for medical services which would be paid for by the state; and

Payment of the premiums may be less expensive for the state than payment of the medical services.

Health or medical insurance premiums paid for in accordance with subsection (b) of this section shall be reviewed periodically to ensure payment of the premiums does not exceed the cost for provision of medical services. The authority granted under subsection (b) of this section shall terminate effective June 30, 1996.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 2; 1994, ch. 9, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1996, ch. 13, § 1; 1998, ch. 7, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 116, §
1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 70, §
1, added (a)(ix).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, § 1, made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2010 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Construction. —

There was nothing in language of former subdivision (a)(viii) of this section that accorded superintendent of Wyoming boys' school permanent status; amendment of that provision to add at-will employment language therefore did not amount to breach of an implied contract. Renaud v. Wyoming Dep't of Family Servs., 203 F.3d 723, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 1672 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2000).

Stated

in

RM v. Department of Family Servs., 953 P.2d 477,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 9-2-2105.
Director of department; appointment; removal; duties.

With the advice and consent of the senate the governor shall appoint a director for the department who shall serve under the direction of the governor and who may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 2.

§ 9-2-2106.
Departmental advisory council; created; term; composition; meetings; removal of members; selection of officers; vacancies; expenses.

There is created within the department an advisory council of not more than sixteen (16) members. Each member shall serve a three (3) year term, except legislators shall serve only for the term of office during which they were appointed. The council shall include:

One (1) member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate;

One (1) member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

Not more than fourteen (14) members appointed by the governor to represent the interests of the public and the department.

The departmental advisory council shall meet at least three (3) times each year.

The governor may remove any member of the departmental advisory council, except those appointed from the legislature, as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

At the first meeting of the departmental advisory council, and annually thereafter when new appointments are made, a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary shall be selected from among the membership by vote of the council members.

Vacancies on the departmental advisory council shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired term.

Members of the departmental advisory council shall not receive compensation for their services, but when actually engaged in the performance of their duties, they shall receive travel expenses, per diem and mileage expenses in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA) (20 USC § 1232g), 112 ALR Fed 1.